Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2705
Equity purchase contract, defined.

Equity purchase contract means an agreement between an equity purchaser and a homeowner pertaining to the acquisition of title to the homeowner's personal residence.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 5.